Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-152
Goods made by confined persons; reciprocity.

Goods produced in whole or in part by persons confined in another state or territory may be transported and sold in this state in the same manner as goods produced by persons committed to the department in this state may be transported or sold in that state or territory.

Laws 1935, c. 183, § 10, p. 681;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 83-965;

R.S.1943, § 83-152;

Laws 1969, c. 820, § 4, p. 3127;

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 74, p. 3108;

Laws 1980, LB 319, § 9.